src/fst/stems/noninflecting_adjectives.lexc
perekonnata+A:pˈerekonnata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
peruvõitu+A:peru%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pesemata+A:pesemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pesueht+A:pesu%#˘eht GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@pigis+A:@P.Case.Ine@pigis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
piiritlemata+A:piiritlemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pikavõitu+A:pika%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@pilukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@pilukil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
piluli+A:piluli GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@pilves+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘ilves GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
pimedavõitu+A:pimeda%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@pinevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@pinevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pingul+A:pingul GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
pinguli+A:pinguli GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pinnul+A:pinnul GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pisarais+A:pisarais GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
plussmärgiga+A:pl˘uss%#märgiga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pohmellis+A:pohmˈelʲlis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pohmeluses+A:pohmeluses GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
poikvel+A:p˘oikvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
polüküllastamata+A:polü%#küllastamata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@pommis+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘ommis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
poolkogemata+A:p˘ool%#kogemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
poolpurjus+A:p˘ool%#p˘urjus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
porgandikarva+A:porgandi%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
porikarva+A:pori%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pragudega+A:pragudega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@praokil+A:@P.Case.Ine@pr˘aokil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pretensioonideta+A:pretensi˘oonideta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@pruntis+A:@P.Case.Ine@pr˘unʲtis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pruudieas+A:pruudʲi%#˘eas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
puhastverd+A:puhast%#v˘erd GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@puhevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@puhevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@puhvis+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘uhvis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
puksiiris+A:puksˈiiris GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@pulkas+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘ulkas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@pulstis+A:@P.Case.Ine@pulʲstis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
punasevõitu+A:punase%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@pungas+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘ungas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@pungis+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘ungis GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@punnis+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘unʲnis GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@purjakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@purjakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
purjeis+A:p˘urjeis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@purjes+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘urjes GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@purjus+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘urjus GI  "weight: 7 " ; 
purupurjus+A:puru%#p˘urjus GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
puseriti+A:puseriti GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
puudustega+A:p˘uudustega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
puutumata+A:p˘uutumata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
põhimõteteta+A:põhi%#mõteteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
põlastusväärt+A:põlastus%#v˘äärt GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
põlgusväärt+A:p˘õlgus%#v˘äärt GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@põnevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@põnevil GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@põnnis+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘õnʲnis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
põrgumoodi+A:p˘õrgu%#m˘oodʲi GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
päikeseta+A:p˘äikeseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pärani+A:pärani GI  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Case.Short@päris+A:@P.Case.Short@päris GI  "weight: 5 " ; 
päriskoduta+A:päris%#koduta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pöördevormita+A:p˘öörde%#vormita GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pühade+A:pühade GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
püstloodi+A:p˘üsʲt%#l˘oodʲi GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
püstloodis+A:p˘üsʲt%#l˘oodʲis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@raagus+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘aagus GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@raamas+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘aamas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
rafineerimata+A:rafin˘eerimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
rahaga+A:rahaga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
rahata+A:rahata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@raisus+A:@P.Case.Ine@raisus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@rajuvil+A:@P.Case.Ine@rajuvil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@rakkus+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘akkus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@rangis+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘angis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
raskevõitu+A:r˘aske%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@rasvas+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘asvas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@raudus+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘audus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@rebevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@rebevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
redusse+A:redusse GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
registreerimata+A:registr˘eerimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
relvadeta+A:r˘elvadeta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@relvis+A:@P.Case.Ine@relvis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@ribevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@ribevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@rihtis+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘ihtis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@riides+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘iides GI  "weight: 8 " ; 
riigikaitsenõukogu+A:riigi%#k˘aitse%#n˘õu%#kogu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
riigileival+A:riigi%#leival GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@riimis+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘iimis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
riius+A:riius GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
riketega+A:riketega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@rikkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘ikkis GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
rikkumata+A:r˘ikkumata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
ringluses+A:r˘ingluses GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@ripakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@ripakil GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@risakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@risakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
risa-räsa+A:risa-räsa GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
riskeerimata+A:risk˘eerimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
riskita+A:riskita GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@ristis+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘isʲtis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ristloodis+A:r˘ist%#l˘oodʲis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@rohtus+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘ohtus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
rohukarva+A:rohu%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@roostes+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘oostes GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@rullis+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘ulʲlis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ruttamata+A:r˘uttamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
rõhtloodis+A:r˘õht%#l˘oodʲis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@rõõmukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@rõõmukil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
räbalais+A:räbalais GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@rähmas+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘ähmas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@räsakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@räsakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@räsas+A:@P.Case.Ine@räsas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@räämas+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘äämas GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@rööpas+A:@P.Case.Ine@r˘ööpas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@röötsakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@röötsakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
saamata+A:saamata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sagris+A:@P.Case.Ine@sagris GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sakris+A:@P.Case.Ine@s˘akris GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
salakirjas+A:sala%#kirʲjas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
salgamata+A:s˘algamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@salkus+A:@P.Case.Ine@s˘alkus GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
sapisevõitu+A:sapise%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
sarvedega+A:s˘arvedega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
sarvedeta+A:s˘arvedeta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sassis+A:@P.Case.Ine@s˘asʲsis GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
sedalaadi+A:seda%#l˘aadʲi GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
sedasorti+A:seda%#s˘orti GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
segamini+A:segamini GI  "weight: 8 " ; 
segasevõitu+A:segase%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
selgroota+A:s˘elʲg%#r˘oota GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
selguseta+A:s˘elguseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
sidrunikarva+A:sidruni%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
siksakkidega+A:s˘iks˘akkidega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
sindrima+A:s˘indrima GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
sinepikarva+A:sinepi%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
sinusorti+A:sinu%#s˘orti GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sirakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@sirakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
sirelikarva+A:sireli%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sirevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@sirevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sirukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@sirukil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
sissetehtud+A:s˘isse%#t˘ehtud GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sompus+A:@P.Case.Ine@s˘ompus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
soolamata+A:s˘oolamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
soolata+A:soolata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sopsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@s˘opsus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sorakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@sorakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sorgus+A:@P.Case.Ine@s˘orgus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sorus+A:@P.Case.Ine@sorus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@sugu+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@sugu GI  "weight: 7 " ; 
suikel+A:s˘uikel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
suitsukarva+A:suitsu%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
suremas+A:suremas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
suurevõitu+A:suure%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
sõitmata+A:s˘õitmata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
sõlmedega+A:s˘õlmedega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sõlmes+A:@P.Case.Ine@s˘õlmes GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
sõltumata+A:s˘õltumata GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
sõnalausumata+A:sõna%#l˘ausumata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
sõnaõigusega+A:sõna%#˘õigusega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@sõõnas+A:@P.Case.Ine@s˘õõnas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
säbarais+A:säbarais GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@säbrus+A:@P.Case.Ine@säbrus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
söömata+A:söömata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@söötis+A:@P.Case.Ine@s˘öötʲis GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
südametunnistuseta+A:südame%#tunʲnistuseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
sündimata+A:s˘ünʲdimata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
süvenemata+A:süvenemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
taevakarva+A:t˘aeva%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tagapõhjata+A:taga%#põhjata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tahtmata+A:t˘ahtmata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
takistusteta+A:takistusteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
taltsutamata+A:taltsutamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@tangus+A:@P.Case.Ine@t˘angus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tasakaalustamata+A:tasa%#kaalustamata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
tasumata+A:tasumata GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
tasuta+A:tasuta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
teada+A:t˘eada GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
teadmata+A:t˘eadmata GI  "weight: 7 " ; 
teadvel+A:t˘eadvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
teadvuseta+A:t˘eadvuseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
teenistuses+A:teenistuses GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
teeskluseta+A:t˘eeskluseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tegemata+A:tegemata GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
tegevuseta+A:tegevuseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
teiesorti+A:teie%#s˘orti GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
teistre+A:t˘eistre GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
temasorti+A:tema%#s˘orti GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
terasest+A:terasest GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tihkevõitu+A:t˘ihke%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tiibadega+A:t˘iibadega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tiibadeta+A:t˘iibadeta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@tiivakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@tiivakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tinakarva+A:tina%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tipp-topp+A:t˘ipp-t˘opp GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
tippudega+A:t˘ippudega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tolmukarva+A:tolmu%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@tompus+A:@P.Case.Ine@t˘ompus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@tongis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t˘ongis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
toorevõitu+A:t˘oore%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@torris+A:@P.Case.Ine@t˘orris GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@torssis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t˘orssis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@tortis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t˘ortis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
toruli+A:toruli GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@tossis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t˘osʲsis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@traksis+A:@P.Case.Ine@tr˘aksis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@trammis+A:@P.Case.Ine@tr˘ammis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
treenimata+A:tr˘eenimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@treppis+A:@P.Case.Ine@tr˘eppis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
triipudega+A:tr˘iipudega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@trimmis+A:@P.Case.Ine@tr˘immis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@troppis+A:@P.Case.Ine@tr˘oppis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tubakakarva+A:tubaka%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tubakavärvi+A:tubaka%#v˘ärvi GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tuhakarva+A:tuha%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tuimavõitu+A:tuima%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tulemata+A:tulemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tulemusteta+A:tulemusteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tumedavõitu+A:tumeda%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tunneteta+A:tunneteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tuntud-teatud+A:t˘untud-t˘eatud GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@turris+A:@P.Case.Ine@t˘urris GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
tursel+A:t˘ursel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tuuleloogus+A:tuule%#l˘oogus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@tuuris+A:@P.Case.Ine@t˘uuris GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tuvastamata+A:tuvastamata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
tõepõhjata+A:t˘õe%#põhjata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tõestamata+A:t˘õestamata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
tõistre+A:t˘õistre GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tõrgeteta+A:tõrgeteta GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
tõrksavõitu+A:t˘õrksa%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@tõrssis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t˘õrssis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tõttamata+A:t˘õttamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tähelepanuväärt+A:tähele%#panu%#v˘äärt GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
tähtajata+A:t˘äht%#ajata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
